Utah statutes.
59-10-1405.   Nonresident pass-through entity taxpayer's share of an addition, subtraction, or adjustment that relates to an item of income, gain, loss, deduction, or credit of a pass-through entity -- In determining source of nonresident pass-through entity taxpayer's income certain provisions of pass-through entity agreement may not be considered -- Rulemaking authority.

(1) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (3), in determining the taxable income of a nonresident pass-through entity taxpayer, an addition, subtraction, or adjustment that relates to an item of income, gain, loss, deduction, or credit of a pass-through entity shall be made in accordance with this Subsection (1).

(b)  For a nonresident pass-through entity taxpayer of a pass-through entity except for a pass-through entity that is an S corporation, the nonresident pass-through entity taxpayer's share of an addition, subtraction, or adjustment that relates to an item of income, gain, loss, deduction, or credit is:

(i)  if the item of income, gain, loss, deduction, or credit is required to be taken into account separately for federal income tax purposes, the nonresident pass-through entity taxpayer's distributive share of the item of income, gain, loss, deduction, or credit:

(A)  for federal income tax purposes;

(B)  determined under Section 704 et seq., Internal Revenue Code; and

(C)  derived from or connected with Utah sources; or

(ii)  if the item of income, gain, loss, deduction, or credit is not required to be taken into account separately for federal income tax purposes, determined in accordance with the nonresident pass-through entity taxpayer's distributive share of income, gain, loss, deduction, or credit:

(A)  relating to the pass-through entity generally;

(B)  for federal income tax purposes;

(C)  under Section 704 et seq., Internal Revenue Code; and

(D)  derived from or connected with Utah sources.

(c)  For a nonresident pass-through entity taxpayer of a pass-through entity that is an S corporation, the nonresident pass-through entity taxpayer's share of an addition, subtraction, or adjustment that relates to an item of income, gain, loss, deduction, or credit is:

(i)  if the item of income, gain, loss, deduction, or credit is required to be taken into account separately for federal income tax purposes, the nonresident pass-through entity taxpayer's pro rata share of the item of income, gain, loss, deduction, or credit:

(A)  for federal income tax purposes;

(B)  determined under Section 1366 et seq., Internal Revenue Code; and

(C)  derived from or connected with Utah sources; or

(ii)  if the item of income, gain, loss, deduction, or credit is not required to be taken into account separately for federal income tax purposes, determined in accordance with the nonresident pass-through entity taxpayer's pro rata share of the item of income, gain, loss, deduction, or credit:

(A)  relating to the pass-through entity generally;

(B)  for federal income tax purposes;

(C)  under Section 1366 et seq., Internal Revenue Code; and

(D)  derived from or connected with Utah sources.

(2)  In determining the source of a nonresident pass-through entity taxpayer's income, the following provisions in a pass-through entity agreement may not be considered:

(a)  a provision that allocates to the nonresident pass-through entity taxpayer, as income, gain, or credit from a source outside this state, a greater proportion of the nonresident pass-through entity taxpayer's share of income, gain, or credit of the pass-through entity than the ratio of income, gain, or credit of the pass-through entity from sources outside this state to income, gain, or credit of the pass-through entity from all sources; or

(b)  a provision that allocates to the nonresident pass-through entity taxpayer a greater proportion of an item of loss or deduction of the pass-through entity derived from or connected with Utah sources than the taxpayer's share of loss or deduction generally:

(i)  relating to the pass-through entity; and

(ii)  for federal income tax purposes.

(3)  The commission may by rule, made in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, authorize the use of a calculation other than the calculation provided in Subsection (1), for determining a nonresident pass-through entity taxpayer's share of an addition, subtraction, or adjustment that relates to an item of income, gain, loss, deduction, or credit of a pass-through entity derived from or connected with Utah sources if:

(a)  the nonresident pass-through entity taxpayer applies to the commission; and

(b)  the commission finds that the use of the calculation is appropriate and equitable.



Amended by Chapter 312, 2009 General Session

